Rhode Island, session 2025, SB392.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-21 of the General Laws entitled "Health and Safety of Pupils" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-21-43. Basic emergency and response skills for teachers.
(a) At least eighty percent (80%) of teachers in each district shall have been trained in the
basic emergency and response skills ("BEARS") curriculum, including, hands-only
cardiopulmonary resuscitation, Heimlich maneuver, and bleeding control, within the last three (3)
years.
(b) In the school year 2025-2026, the BEARS curriculum will also include safety training
related to SARS-COV-2.
(c) The BEARS training requirements shall phase into effect over a three (3) year
timeframe. One third (⅓) of all teachers shall be required to complete "BEARS" teacher training
every year, until at least eighty percent (80%) of teachers in each district have been trained once
during the school years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-2028.
(d) Time spent by teachers receiving initial and refresher training in BEARS shall count
towards professional development requirements.
(e) The department of education shall verify that the required percentage of teachers in
each school district have been trained in the BEARS curriculum; however, each individual school
district shall have autonomy over how the curriculum is implemented within each district.
(f) A teacher or other school personnel, who has completed BEARS training, who renders

emergency care on school grounds, school buildings, or during school functions, shall not be liable
to the person assisted, for civil damages for any injuries which result from acts or omissions by the
person rendering the emergency care of administration of subjects covered by the BEARS
curriculum, which may constitute ordinary negligence. The immunity provided in this subsection
does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross, willful or wanton negligence.
(g) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require any teacher or other
school personnel to render emergency first aid.
(h) Each school district shall, from funds not otherwise allocated during the fiscal year,
provide funding for each faculty member trained, at a rate determined in the state budget.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001388
========
LC001388 - Page 2 of 3